Illinois, session 104th, HB1856.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2 and 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/2)  (from Ch. 116, par. 202)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    (a) "Public body" means all legislative, executive, 9judicial, administrative, or advisory bodies of the State, 10state universities and colleges, counties, townships, cities, 11villages, incorporated towns, school districts and all other 12municipal corporations, boards, bureaus, committees, or 13commissions of this State, any subsidiary bodies of any of the 14foregoing including but not limited to committees and 15subcommittees thereof, and a School Finance Authority created 16under Article 1E of the School Code. "Public body" does not 17include a child death review team or the Illinois Child Death 18Review Teams Executive Council established under the Child 19Death Review Team Act, or a regional youth advisory board or 20the Statewide Youth Advisory Board established under the 21Department of Children and Family Services Statewide Youth 22Advisory Board Act.23    (b) "Person" means any individual, corporation,   HB1856- 2 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1partnership, firm, organization or association, acting 2individually or as a group.3    (c) "Public records" means all records, reports, forms, 4writings, letters, memoranda, books, papers, maps, 5photographs, microfilms, cards, tapes, recordings, electronic 6data processing records, electronic communications, recorded 7information and all other documentary materials pertaining to 8the transaction of public business, regardless of physical 9form or characteristics, having been prepared by or for, or 10having been or being used by, received by, in the possession 11of, or under the control of any public body.12    (c-5) "Private information" means unique identifiers, 13including a person's social security number, driver's license 14number, employee identification number, biometric identifiers, 15personal financial information, passwords or other access 16codes, medical records, home or personal telephone numbers, 17and personal email addresses. Private information also 18includes home address and personal license plates, except as 19otherwise provided by law or when compiled without possibility 20of attribution to any person. For a public body that is a 21HIPAA-covered entity, "private information" includes 22electronic medical records and all information, including 23demographic information, contained within or extracted from an 24electronic medical records system operated or maintained by 25the public body in compliance with State and federal medical 26privacy laws and regulations, including, but not limited to,   HB1856- 3 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and 2its regulations, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this 3subsection, "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to 4the term "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103.5    (c-10) "Commercial purpose" means the use of any part of a 6public record or records, or information derived from public 7records, in any form for sale, resale, or solicitation or 8advertisement for sales or services. For purposes of this 9definition, requests made by news media and non-profit, 10scientific, or academic organizations shall not be considered 11to be made for a "commercial purpose" when the principal 12purpose of the request is (i) to access and disseminate 13information concerning news and current or passing events, 14(ii) for articles of opinion or features of interest to the 15public, or (iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or 16public research or education.17    (d) "Copying" means the reproduction of any public record 18by means of any photographic, electronic, mechanical or other 19process, device or means now known or hereafter developed and 20available to the public body.21    (e) "Head of the public body" means the president, mayor, 22chairman, presiding officer, director, superintendent, 23manager, supervisor or individual otherwise holding primary 24executive and administrative authority for the public body, or 25such person's duly authorized designee.26    (f) "News media" means a newspaper or other periodical   HB1856- 4 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1issued at regular intervals whether in print or electronic 2format, a news service whether in print or electronic format, 3a radio station, a television station, a television network, a 4community antenna television service, or a person or 5corporation engaged in making news reels or other motion 6picture news for public showing.7    (g) "Recurrent requester", as used in Section 3.2 of this 8Act, means a person that, in the 12 months immediately 9preceding the request, has submitted to the same public body 10(i) a minimum of 50 requests for records, (ii) a minimum of 15 11requests for records within a 30-day period, or (iii) a 12minimum of 7 requests for records within a 7-day period. For 13purposes of this definition, requests made by news media and 14non-profit, scientific, or academic organizations shall not be 15considered in calculating the number of requests made in the 16time periods in this definition when the principal purpose of 17the requests is (i) to access and disseminate information 18concerning news and current or passing events, (ii) for 19articles of opinion or features of interest to the public, or 20(iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or public 21research or education.22    For the purposes of this subsection (g), "request" means a 23written document (or oral request, if the public body chooses 24to honor oral requests) that is submitted to a public body via 25personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 26means available to the public body and that identifies the   HB1856- 5 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1particular public record the requester seeks. One request may 2identify multiple records to be inspected or copied. 3    (h) "Voluminous request" means a request that: (i) 4includes more than 5 individual requests for more than 5 5different categories of records or a combination of individual 6requests that total requests for more than 5 different 7categories of records in a period of 20 business days; or (ii) 8requires the compilation of more than 500 letter or 9legal-sized pages of public records unless a single requested 10record exceeds 500 pages. "Single requested record" may 11include, but is not limited to, one report, form, e-mail, 12letter, memorandum, book, map, microfilm, tape, or recording.13    "Voluminous request" does not include a request made by 14news media and non-profit, scientific, or academic 15organizations if the principal purpose of the request is: (1) 16to access and disseminate information concerning news and 17current or passing events; (2) for articles of opinion or 18features of interest to the public; or (3) for the purpose of 19academic, scientific, or public research or education.20    For the purposes of this subsection (h), "request" means a 21written document, or oral request, if the public body chooses 22to honor oral requests, that is submitted to a public body via 23personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 24means available to the public body and that identifies the 25particular public record or records the requester seeks. One 26request may identify multiple individual records to be   HB1856- 6 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1inspected or copied. 2    (i) "Severance agreement" means a mutual agreement between 3any public body and its employee for the employee's 4resignation in exchange for payment by the public body. 5(Source: P.A. 103-554, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (5 ILCS 140/7)7    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 8    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 9record that contains information that is exempt from 10disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 11that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 12to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 13shall make the remaining information available for inspection 14and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 15be exempt from inspection and copying: 16        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 17    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 18    regulations implementing federal or State law. 19        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 20    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 21    or a court order. 22        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 23    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 24    specifically designed to provide information to one or 25    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or   HB1856- 7 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 2        (c) Personal information contained within public 3    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 4    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 5    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 6    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 7    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 8    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 9    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 10    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 11    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 12    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 13    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 14    privacy. 15        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 16    created in the course of administrative enforcement 17    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 18    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 19    extent that disclosure would: 20            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 21        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 22        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 23        agency that is the recipient of the request; 24            (ii) interfere with active administrative 25        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 26        that is the recipient of the request;   HB1856- 8 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 2        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 3        hearing; 4            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 5        confidential source, confidential information 6        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 7        who file complaints with or provide information to 8        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 9        penal agencies; except that the identities of 10        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 11        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 12        local government, except when disclosure would 13        interfere with an active criminal investigation 14        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 15        request; 16            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 17        techniques other than those generally used and known 18        or disclose internal documents of correctional 19        agencies related to detection, observation, or 20        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 21        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 22        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 23        request; 24            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 25        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 26            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation   HB1856- 9 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 2        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 3    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 4    record management system if the law enforcement agency 5    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 6    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 7    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 8    access to the record through the shared electronic record 9    management system. 10        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 11    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 12    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 13    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 14    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 15    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 16    Board. 17        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 18    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 19    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 20        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 21    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 22        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 23    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 24    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 25    materials are available in the library of the correctional 26    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is   HB1856- 10 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    confined. 2        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 5    materials include records from staff members' personnel 6    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 7    information. 8        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 9    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 10    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 11    through an administrative request to the Department of 12    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 13    Mental Health. 14        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 15    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 16    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 17    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 18    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 19    institution or facility.20        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 21    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 22    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 23    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 24    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 25    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 26    or school address, work telephone number, social security   HB1856- 11 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    number, or any other identifying information, except as 2    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 3    or claim. 4        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 5    requested by a person committed to the Department of 6    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 7    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 8    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 9    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 10    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 11    claim. 12        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 13    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 14    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 15    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 16    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 17    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 18    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 19    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 20    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents 21    and to all those records that pertain to the preparation 22    of judicial opinions and orders. 23        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 24    information obtained from a person or business where the 25    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 26    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary,   HB1856- 12 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 2    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 3    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 4    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 5    requested.6        The information included under this exemption includes 7    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 8    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 9    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 10    company within the investment portfolio of a private 11    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 12    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 13    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 14    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 15    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 16    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 17    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 18    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 19    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 20    privately held company may cause competitive harm.21        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 22    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 23    to disclosure. 24        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 25    agreement, including information which if it were 26    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage   HB1856- 13 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 2    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 3    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 4    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 5    award or final selection is made. 6        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 7    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 8    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 9    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 10    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 11    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 12    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 13    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 14    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 15    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 16    legal rights of the general public. 17        (j) The following information pertaining to 18    educational matters:19            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 20        examination data used to administer an academic 21        examination; 22            (ii) information received by a primary or 23        secondary school, college, or university under its 24        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 25        their academic peers; 26            (iii) information concerning a school or   HB1856- 14 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 2        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 3        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and4            (iv) course materials or research materials used 5        by faculty members. 6        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 7    submissions, and other construction related technical 8    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 9    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 10    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 11    including, but not limited to, power generating and 12    distribution stations and other transmission and 13    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 14    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 15    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 16    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 17    security. 18        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 19    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 20    public body makes the minutes available to the public 21    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 22        (m) Communications between a public body and an 23    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 24    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 25    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 26    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative   HB1856- 15 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 2    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 3    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 4        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 5    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 6    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 7    cases in which discipline is imposed. 8        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 9    with automated data processing operations, including, but 10    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 11    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 12    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 13    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 14    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 15    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 16    security of the system or its data or the security of 17    materials exempt under this Section. 18        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 19    between public bodies and their employees or 20    representatives, except that any final contract or 21    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 22        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 23    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 24    an applicant for a license or employment. 25        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 26    to real estate purchase negotiations until those   HB1856- 16 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 2    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 3    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 4    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 5    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 6    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 7    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 8    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 9    until a sale is consummated. 10        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 11    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 12    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 13    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 14    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 15    intergovernmental risk management association or 16    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 17    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 18        (t) Information contained in or related to 19    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 20    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 21    for the regulation or supervision of financial 22    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 23    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 24    law. 25        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 26    the disclosure of secret or confidential information,   HB1856- 17 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 2    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 3    Electronic Transactions Act. 4        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 5    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 6    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 7    community's population or systems, facilities, or 8    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 9    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 10    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 11    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 12    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 13    include such things as details pertaining to the 14    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 15    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 16    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 17        (w) (Blank). 18        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 19    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 20    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 21    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 22    Illinois Power Agency. 23        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 24    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 25    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 26    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities   HB1856- 18 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 2    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 3    Commission. 4        (z) Information about students exempted from 5    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 6    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 7    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 8    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 9    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 10        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 11    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 12        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 13    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 14    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 15    Mortality Review Team Act. 16        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 17    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 18    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 19    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.20        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 21    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 22    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 23    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 24        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 25    information of persons who are minors and are also 26    participants and registrants in programs of park   HB1856- 19 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 2    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 3    associations.4        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 5    information of participants and registrants in programs of 6    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 7    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 8    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 9    minors.10        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 11    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 12    2012. 13        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 14    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 15    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 16    School Code and any information contained in that report. 17        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 18    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 19    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 20    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 21    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 22    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 23    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 24    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 25    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 26    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of   HB1856- 20 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    Corrections.2        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 3    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 4        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 5    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 6    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 7    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 8    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 9    of a governmental entity or a person. 10        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 11    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 12    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 13    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 14    the procedure.15        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 16    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 17    Confidential Reporting Act. 18        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 19    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 20    Act. 21        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 22    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 23        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 24    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 25    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 26    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological   HB1856- 21 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 2    Act.3        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 4    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 5        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 6    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 7        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 8    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 9    protected health information, including demographic 10    information, that may be contained within or extracted 11    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 12    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 13    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 14    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 15    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 16    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 17    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 18    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 19    160.103. 20        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 21    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 22    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 23    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 24        (uu) Records that are subject to fees under Section 25    27.1b or 28 of the Clerks of Court Act. Those records shall 26    continue to be available as provided in those Sections.   HB1856- 22 -LRB104 08925 BDA 18980 b1    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 2Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 3prior to disclosure under this Act. 4    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 5public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 6agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 7behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 8governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 9Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 10for purposes of this Act. 11    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 12information or limit the availability of records to the 13public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 14in this Act. 15(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 171-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 18eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 19103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 208-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 21eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)